New York, session 2025-2026, A2584.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings and intent. The legislature hereby 2 finds that children are an inherently vulnerable population, and that 3 marketing food and beverages high in saturated fatty acids, trans-fatty 4 acids, and free sugars in a targeted and persistent manner to this group 5 is inconsistent with this state's efforts to curb the disastrous health 6 outcomes that follow the overconsumption of these products which include 7 but are not limited to increased rates of malnutrition, undernutrition, 8 micronutrient deficiencies, obesity, and other diet-related illnesses. 9 Such marketing is inherently misleading, aggressive, and pervasive as 10 children often lack the same ability to resist the rewarding cues 11 presented in unhealthy food marketing as adults. New York has a strong 12 and substantial interest in protecting our children from negative health 13 consequences and remain aligned with the goals of the Convention on the 14 Rights of the Child which ensures access to nutritious foods and freedom 15 from exploitation of all kinds. Additionally, the power of the state is 16 at its greatest when protecting the health and welfare of its citizens, 17 especially those most vulnerable. Thus, the legislature finds that 18 unfair and deceptive marketing targeted at children can mislead and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00461-08-6 A. 2584--A 2 1 manipulate children into lifelong habits, and that such unfair and 2 deceptive advertising should be regulated accordingly. 3 § 2. Section 350-a of the general business law is amended by adding a 4 new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 5 5. For purposes of this section, factors for determining whether an 6 advertisement is false advertising shall include, but not be limited to, 7 whether the advertisement is directed at a child as defined in section 8 seventy-five-a of the domestic relations law, or a parent or guardian 9 acting on a child's behalf. In determining whether an advertisement 10 concerning a food or food product is directed at a child or a parent or 11 guardian acting on a child's behalf, factors shall include, but not be 12 limited to: 13 (a) Subject matter; 14 (b) Visual content; 15 (c) Use of bright colors and animated characters or child-oriented 16 activities and incentives; 17 (d) Music or other audio content; 18 (e) Age of models; 19 (f) Presence of child celebrities or celebrities who appeal to chil- 20 dren; 21 (g) Language including claims, buzzwords, sayings, and/or phrases that 22 are trending such as common colloquial words specific to the age group; 23 (h) Competent and reliable empirical evidence regarding audience 24 composition and evidence regarding the intended audience composition and 25 evidence regarding the intended audience; 26 (i) Physical location of advertisement, including, but not limited to, 27 proximity to schools or other institutions frequented by children; 28 (j) Medium by which the advertisement is communicated, including, but 29 not limited to, social media, or television/commercial advertising; and 30 (k) Other related factors including, but not limited to, the ease of 31 accessibility of the product for children. 32 § 3. Section 202-a of the agriculture and markets law is amended by 33 adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 34 4. In determining whether a violation of this section has occurred, 35 the court shall consider the factors set forth in section three hundred 36 fifty-a of the general business law, and special consideration shall be 37 given to advertising directed at a child or a parent or guardian acting 38 on a child's behalf. 39 § 4. Subdivision 1 of section 2599-b of the public health law, as 40 amended by section 1 of part A of chapter 469 of the laws of 2015, is 41 amended to read as follows: 42 1. The program shall be designed to prevent and reduce the incidence 43 and prevalence of obesity in children and adolescents, especially among 44 populations with high rates of obesity and obesity-related health 45 complications including, but not limited to, diabetes, heart disease, 46 cancer, osteoarthritis, asthma, emphysema, chronic bronchitis, other 47 chronic respiratory diseases and other conditions. The program shall use 48 recommendations and goals of the United States departments of agricul- 49 ture and health and human services, the surgeon general and centers for 50 disease control and prevention in developing and implementing guidelines 51 for nutrition education and physical activity projects as part of obesi- 52 ty prevention efforts. The content and implementation of the program 53 shall stress the benefits of choosing a balanced, healthful diet from 54 the many options available to consumers, [without specifically targeting 55 the elimination of any particular food group, food product or food-re- 56 lated industry] that specifically includes education on access and the A. 2584--A 3 1 nutritional value of locally grown foods and food products. This shall 2 include but not be limited to, dairy, fruit and vegetable food products. 3 The program shall cooperate with the department of agriculture and 4 markets to add access to locally grown foods and food products. This 5 shall include but not be limited to, dairy, fruit and vegetable food 6 products within the guidelines and framework of the program. 7 § 5. Severability. If any part or provision of this act or its appli- 8 cation to a person is held invalid, the invalidity of that part, 9 provision or application does not affect other parts, provisions or 10 applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid 11 provision or application. 12 § 6. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 13 have become a law.